District of Columbia statutes.
7-2081.03

Liability.

(a)

A health care practitioner or a pharmacist who reasonably and in good faith renders EPT in accordance with this chapter or any other District law shall not be subject to civil or criminal liability or be deemed to have engaged in improper professional conduct.

(b)

This subsection shall not apply to the donation, distribution, furnishing, or dispensing of an antimicrobial drug by a health care practitioner or pharmacist whose act or omission involves reckless, wanton, or intentional misconduct.

History

Apr. 30, 2014, D.C. Law 20-97, § 4, 61 DCR 1589